Arkansas, session 2025, HB1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 59, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-59-120. Uniform chart of accounts.
(a)(1) The Legislative Auditor shall develop a comprehensive financial
management system, to be known as the "uniform chart of accounts", for
appropriated funds of cities of the second class and incorporated towns.
(2) The purpose of the uniform chart of accounts is to provide
necessary financial information for the mayors, councils, and other
interested officers and departments of cities of the second class and
incorporated towns.
(b) In developing the uniform of chart of accounts under this section,
*MBM029*
01/29/2025 1:43:30 PM MBM029

HB1311
the Legislative Auditor shall:
(1) Provide for a uniform account coding structure over
revenues, expenditures, and balances to assure that current information will
always be available concerning the financial condition of cities of the
second class and incorporated towns and their various offices and
departments; and
(2) Include without limitation budgeting and fund classification
aspects designed to classify the receipt of funds and the appropriations and
disbursements of funds in accordance with the object and purpose of the
expenditures in sufficient detail to:
(A) Be suitable for an analysis of the operations of all
offices and departments of cities of the second class and incorporated towns;
and
(B) Provide a breakdown and itemization of all
expenditures compatible with and comparable to the appropriations of councils
of cities of the second class and incorporated towns.

SECTION 2. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. No later than thirty-
six (36) months following the effective date of this act, the Legislative
Auditor shall develop and complete a process for phasing in the use of the
uniform chart of accounts under § 14-59-120.















01/29/2025 1:43:30 PM MBM029